Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 5 Conservator’s Bond and Other Obligations

29-5-40.
Bond requirement; exception to requirement; recording.

A conservator appointed by the court, including a conservator appointed in a final order accepting the transfer of a conservatorship proceeding from another state issued under subsection (e) of Code Section 29-11-21, shall give bond with good and sufficient security.

A financial institution, trust company, national or state bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association described in Code Section 7-1-242 that seeks to qualify as a conservator is not required to give bond for the faithful performance of its duties unless its combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits are less than $3 million as reflected in its last statements signed by the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States or the commissioner of banking and finance.

The clerk of the court shall record bonds in books kept for that purpose and shall retain custody of the bonds.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 18/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, inserted “, including a conservator appointed in a final order accepting the transfer of a conservatorship proceeding from another state issued under subsection (e) of Code Section 29-11-21,” in subsection (a).

29-5-41.
Terms of conservator’s bond; timing; value; substantial compliance sufficient.

The bond of a conservator shall be:

Secured by an individual who is a domiciliary of this state or by a licensed commercial surety authorized to transact business in this state;

Payable to the court for the benefit of the ward;

Conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the conservator’s duty, as such is required by law; and

Attested by the judge or clerk of the court.

The court may order a conservator who is required to give bond to post bond for a period of time greater than one year, as may be appropriate in the circumstances. A surety on a bond posted pursuant to this subsection shall not be relieved of liability merely because of the expiration of the term of the bond but shall be subject to the provisions of law for the discharge of a surety applicable to other bonds.

The bond shall be in a value equal to double the estimated value of the ward’s estate; provided, however, that the bond shall be in an amount equal to the estimated value of the estate if secured by a licensed commercial surety authorized to transact business in this state. The value of the estate for purposes of the bond shall be determined without regard to the value of any real property or improvements thereon; but, upon conversion of the real property into personal property, a bond shall be given based upon the value of the estate including the value of the personal property into which the real property was converted.

Substantial compliance with these requirements for the bond shall be deemed sufficient; and no bond shall be declared invalid by reason of any variation from these requirements as to payee, amount, or condition, where the manifest intention was to give bond as conservator and a breach of the fiduciary’s duty as such has been proved.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

Cross references.

Time limitation on bringing of actions against guardians, §

9-3-27

.

Statute of limitations for prosecution for conversion by guardian of property of ward, §

17-3-2

.

29-5-42.
Reduction in bond.

If the value of the ward’s bonded estate decreases, the court may permit a corresponding reduction in the value of the bond, but this reduction does not affect the liability of the surety for prior waste or misconduct of the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-43.
Requirement of additional bond or security.

Whenever it comes to the knowledge of the court, either by annual returns or otherwise that:

Additional personal property has accrued to the ward by descent, gift, or otherwise;

For any other reason the bond or security of the conservator fails to comply with the minimum statutory bond amount set forth in Code Section 29-5-40; or

The bond or security is otherwise insufficient in the judgment of the court,

the court shall give notice to the conservator to appear and give additional bond or security. Notice shall be mailed by first-class mail to the conservator and to the surety on the conservator’s bond. If the conservator fails to comply with the notice, the court may revoke the letters of conservatorship in accordance with Code Section 29-5-92.

When it comes to the knowledge of the court that the surety on the conservator’s bond has died, become insolvent, or removed from this state or if from other cause the security becomes insufficient, the court may give notice to the conservator to appear and give other and sufficient security. Notice shall be mailed by first-class mail to the conservator and to the surety on the conservator’s bond. If the conservator fails to comply with the notice, the court may revoke the letters of conservatorship in accordance with Code Section 29-5-92.

With respect to any bond filed with a conservatorship order from another state that has been registered with and recorded by the court under Code Section 29-11-31, in addition to any action the court may take under this article or under subsection (b) of Code Section 29-11-32, such court of this state may communicate with the appointing court in such other state under subsection (a) of Code Section 29-11-4 to inform such appointing court of the insufficiency of such bond under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, stating the reasons therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 19/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted “29-5-92” for “29-5-102” at the end of subsection (b) and added subsection (c).

29-5-44.
Payment of bond premium.

A conservator who is required to give bond, and who has given as security on the bond one or more licensed commercial sureties, may pay any bond premium from the estate.

When the guardian is required to give bond pursuant to Code Section 29-4-30, the conservator shall, upon the request of the guardian, pay any bond premium from the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 20/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, inserted “, upon the request of the guardian,” in subsection (b).

Cross references.

Time limitation on bringing of actions against guardians, §

9-3-27

.

Statute of limitations for prosecution for conversion by guardian of property of ward, §

17-3-2

.

29-5-45.
Liability of surety in event conservatorship is void.

If the appointment of a conservator for any cause is declared void, the surety of that conservator shall nevertheless be responsible on the bond for any property received by the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-46.
Joint and several liability of conservator and surety.

The conservator and any surety shall be held and deemed joint and several obligors and may be subjected jointly and severally to liability in the same action. When a conservator moves beyond the limits of this state, dies, and leaves an unrepresented estate, or is in a position that an attachment may be issued as against a debtor, any party in interest or any person having demands against that conservator in the conservator’s representative capacity may institute an action against any one or more of the sureties on the bond of the conservator in the first instance, without first obtaining a judgment against the conservator in that person’s representative capacity.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-47.
Levy upon property; writs of execution.

When a judgment has been obtained against the conservator or the surety on the bond of a conservator, or both, a levy may be made upon any property of any defendant in fi. fa.

The court shall be authorized to enter a judgment and to issue a writ of execution against the conservator and surety on the bond and shall be authorized to grant judgment and execution in favor of the surety against the conservator upon payment of the judgment by the surety.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-48.
Order of levy against property.

In all cases of judgments recovered against a conservator or any surety of a conservator, the execution shall first be levied on the property of the surety and no levy shall be made on the property of the conservator until there is a return of nulla bona as to the surety.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-49.
Discharge of surety from obligations under bond; reporting.

The surety on the bond of any conservator or, if the surety is dead, the surety’s personal representative, may at any time petition the court regarding any misconduct of the conservator in the discharge of the conservator’s trust or to show the court his or her desire for any reason to be relieved as surety. The death of a surety shall be a sufficient ground for the discharge of the surety from future liability.

Upon a petition by the surety or the surety’s personal representative, the court shall cite the conservator to appear and show cause, if any, why the surety should not be discharged. After hearing the parties and the evidence, the court, in its discretion, may issue an order discharging the surety from all future liability and require the conservator to give new and sufficient security or be removed.

If new security is given, the discharged surety shall be discharged only from liability for future misconduct of the conservator from the time the new security is given. The new surety shall be liable for past as well as future misconduct of the conservator.

If new security is not given and the conservator is removed, the discharged surety shall be bound for a true accounting of the conservator with the successor conservator or with the ward if no other conservator is appointed. In all cases where letters of conservatorship are revoked, any surety on the bond shall be liable for all acts of the conservator in relation to the trust up until the time of the settlement with the new conservator or the ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

Cross references.

Requiring guardian to give other security or be discharged on application of ward’s relative or on court’s own motion, §

29-4-15

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article on wills, trusts and administration of estates, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 381 (1998).

29-5-49.1.
Communication with other states on conservatorship.

With respect to a conservatorship order from another state that has been registered with and recorded by a court of this state under Code Section 29-11-31, in addition to any action such court of this state may take under this article or under subsection (b) of Code Section 29-11-32, such court of this state may communicate with the appointing court in such other state under subsection (a) of Code Section 29-11-4 to inform such appointing court of any proceeding relating to the conservatorship initiated in this state under this article, stating the reasons therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-49.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 21/HB 70.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2020.